Nebraska, session 109, LB163.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB163 LB163
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) There is created within the Department of
Environment and Energy the Office of Climate Action. The office shall
work with interested stakeholders in climate action, political
subdivisions, and organizations supporting climate action across this
state to enhance education and skills, provide technical support, and
expand access to resources to support climate action. The office shall
serve as a point of contact to assist with policies and programs dealing
with climate action.
(2) The Office of Climate Action shall employ personnel to create
policies that support climate action and fulfill the duties of the
office.
(3) On or before July 1, 2026, the Office of Climate Action shall
create a climate action plan that shall propose actions to:
(a) Manage the risks of climate change impacts on the state; and
(b) Reduce the causes of climate change within the state.
(4) On or before July 1 of each year, the Office of Climate Action
shall file with the Clerk of the Legislature an annual report that
details:
(a) The extent to which state legislation enacted the prior year
supports, hinders, or affects climate action;
(b) The amount of federal dollars secured for climate action across
this state;
(c) Any technical assistance provided by the Office of Climate
Action to stakeholders, political subdivisions, and organizations;
(d) The number of times the Office of Climate Action collaborated
with stakeholders, political subdivisions, and organizations;
(e) A synopsis of localized climate action plans and programs; and
(f) Any recommendation for additional climate action through
investment or activities.
(5) For the purposes of this section, climate action means any
effort to combat climate change and its effects.
-2-